Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.662, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Civil action. new text end new text begin A person who is injured by a violation of subdivision 2, paragraph (a), or 3, paragraph (a), may bring a civil action for recovery of damages, together with costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end